Vermont, session 2025-2026, S321.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 7 V.S.A. § 831 is amended to read:
§ 831. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(6) “Public Prohibited place” means any street, alley, park, sidewalk,
public building other than individual dwellings, any place of public
accommodation as defined in 9 V.S.A. § 4501, and any place where the use or
VT LEG #385463 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.321
2026 Page 2 of 5
possession of a lighted tobacco product, tobacco product, or tobacco substitute
is prohibited by law pursuant to 18 V.S.A. chapter 37.
Sec. 2. 7 V.S.A. § 833 is amended to read:
§ 833. CONSUMPTION OF CANNABIS IN A PUBLIC PROHIBITED
PLACE
No person shall possess lighted cannabis or cannabis products, or consume
cannabis by inhalation of vapor, in a public prohibited place unless specifically
authorized by law. Violations shall be punished in accordance with 18 V.S.A.
§ 4230a.
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 4230a is amended to read:
§ 4230a. CANNABIS POSSESSION BY A PERSON 21 YEARS OF AGE
OR OLDER
(a)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person 21 years of age
or older who possesses one ounce or less of cannabis or five grams or less of
hashish and two mature cannabis plants or fewer or four immature cannabis
plants or fewer or who possesses paraphernalia for cannabis use shall not be
penalized or sanctioned in any manner by the State or any of its political
subdivisions or denied any right or privilege under State law. The one-ounce
limit of cannabis or five grams of hashish that may be possessed by a person
21 years of age or older shall not include cannabis cultivated, harvested, and
stored in accordance with section 4230e of this title.
VT LEG #385463 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.321
2026 Page 3 of 5
(2)(A) A person shall not possess lighted cannabis or cannabis products,
or consume cannabis by inhalation of vapor, in a public prohibited place. As
used in this section, “public prohibited place” has the same meaning as
provided by 7 V.S.A. § 831.
* * *
(b)(1) Cannabis possessed or consumed in violation of State law is
contraband pursuant to subsection 4242(d) of this title and subject to seizure
and forfeiture.
(2) This section does not:
(A)(1) exempt a person from arrest, citation, or prosecution for being
under the influence of cannabis while operating a vehicle of any kind or for
consuming cannabis while operating a motor vehicle;
(B)(2) repeal or modify existing laws or policies concerning the
operation of vehicles of any kind while under the influence of cannabis or for
consuming cannabis while operating a motor vehicle;
(C)(3) limit the authority of primary and secondary schools to impose
administrative penalties for the possession of cannabis on school property;
(D)(4) prohibit a municipality from adopting a civil ordinance to
provide additional penalties for consumption of cannabis in a public place
manner that violates this section;
VT LEG #385463 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.321
2026 Page 4 of 5
(E)(5) prohibit a landlord from banning possession or the indoor use
of lighted cannabis, lighted cannabis products, or vaporized cannabis products
in a lease agreement; or
(F)(6) allow an inmate of a correctional facility to possess or use
cannabis or to limit the authority of law enforcement, the courts, the
Department of Corrections, or the Parole Board to impose penalties on
offenders who use cannabis in violation of a court order, conditions of
furlough, parole, or rules of a correctional facility.
* * *
Sec. 4. 18 V.S.A. § 4230e is amended to read:
§ 4230e. CULTIVATION OF CANNABIS BY A PERSON 21 YEARS OF
AGE OR OLDER
* * *
(b)(1) Personal cultivation of cannabis only shall occur:
(A) on property lawfully in possession of the cultivator or with the
written consent of the person in lawful possession of the property; and
(B) in an area that is screened from public view and access is limited
to the cultivator and persons 21 years of age or older who have permission
from the cultivator.
* * *
VT LEG #385463 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.321
2026 Page 5 of 5
Sec. 5. 24 V.S.A. § 2291 is amended to read:
§ 2291. ENUMERATION OF POWERS
For the purpose of promoting the public health, safety, welfare, and
convenience, a town, city, or incorporated village shall have the following
powers:
* * *
(17) To regulate or prohibit possession of:
(A) open or unsealed containers of alcoholic beverages; or
(B) lighted cannabis or cannabis products in public places.
(18) To regulate or prohibit consumption of alcoholic beverages,
cannabis, or cannabis products in public places.
* * *
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385463 v.1